District of Columbia statutes.
4-1302.07

Expungement.

(a)

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, substantiated reports shall not be expunged from the Child Protection Register.

(b)

The staff which maintains the Child Protection Register shall expunge from each inconclusive report all information that identifies any person in the inconclusive report upon the first occurrence of either:

(1)

The 18th birthday of the child who is the subject of the report, if there is no reasonable suspicion or evidence that another child living in the same household or under the care of the same parent, guardian, or custodian has been abused or neglected; or

(2)

The end of the 5th year after the termination of the social rehabilitation services directed toward the abuse and neglect.

(c)

The staff which maintains the Child Protection Register shall expunge:

(1)

Any unfounded report immediately upon such classification by the Agency; and

(2)

Any material successfully challenged as incorrect pursuant to the rules adopted under § 4-1302.06.

Sept. 23, 1977, D.C. Law 2-22, title II, § 207, 24 DCR 3341
Oct. 19, 2002, D.C. Law 14-206, § 2(l), 49 DCR 7815
Mar. 13, 2004, D.C. Law 15-105,§ 35, 51 DCR 881

History

1981 Ed., § 6-2117.
1973 Ed., § 6-2117.

Prior Codifications

D.C. Law 14-206 rewrote the section.
D.C. Law 15-105, in subsec. (b)(1), substituted “the child who is the subject of the report” for “that child”.

Effect of Amendments

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Temporary Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-240, March 25, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2753).

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-494, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 9781).
For temporary (90 day) delay of the applicability of provisions changing the manner in which the Child and Family Services Agency will process reports of child abuse and neglect, see § 3 of Improved Child Abuse Investigations Technical Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-603, January 7, 2003, 50 DCR 687).

Emergency Legislation

Application of Law 14-206: Section 16(b) of D.C. Law 14-310 provided that section 2(a)(2), (4), (5), (6), and (7), (b), (c), (d), (e), (h), (i), (j), (k), and (l) of D.C. Law 14-206 shall apply as of October 1, 2003.

Editor's Notes